Utah statutes.
35A-3-505.   Application -- Referral to civic organizations.

(1)  The division shall, in compliance with Section 35A-3-504, assess whether an applicant would be receptive to and benefit by services from a civic organization.  If so, the division may inform the applicant of the availability of those services and supports.

(2) (a)  If an applicant chooses to receive those services and supports from a civic organization, the division shall facilitate the applicant’s referral to one or more appropriate civic organizations.

(b) If an applicant chooses not to receive the services and supports of a civic organization or requests services and supports available under this chapter in addition to the services and supports of a civic organization, the division shall process the application as provided under this chapter.

